Utah statutes.
72-10-603.   Duties of the Criminal Investigation and Technical Services
Division -- Costs of separate file and background check.
(1)  If a city requests the division to conduct a criminal background check
under Section 72-10-602, the division shall:
(a)  release to the city the full record of criminal convictions for the
ground transportation service provider who is the subject of the background
check;
(b)  if requested by the city, seek additional information from regional or
national criminal data files in conducting the criminal background check;
(c)  maintain a separate file of fingerprints submitted under Section
72-10-602; and
(d)  notify the requesting city when a new entry is made against a ground
transportation service provider whose fingerprints are held in the file.
(2) (a)  Each city requesting a criminal background check shall pay to the
division the cost of:
(i)  maintaining the separate file of fingerprints under Subsection (1); and
(ii)  conducting a criminal background check under Section 72-10-602,
including costs charged by the Federal Bureau of Investigation or other entity
for conducting a national criminal background check, if requested by a city.
(b)  The cost borne by a city under Subsection (2)(a) may be covered by fees
charged to a ground transportation service provider who is the subject of the
background check.
